Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3207] Payment of costs. The
authority conferred by section [304A-3206] shall be exercised only pursuant to
written agreement between the commission and an agency of the State having
responsibility for or duties with respect to programs for assisting residents
of the State to obtain higher education. Any such agreement shall include
provisions for the payment of tuition and any other costs, and no such
agreement shall be made that commits the State or any agency or officer thereof
to any obligation for which funds have not been appropriated or otherwise made
available in accordance with law. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next